Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB499.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1302(e.1) and (k), 1302.1(a), 1304 and 1306(a) introductory paragraph of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 Section 1302. Applications for Official Absentee Ballots.--* * *(e.1) Any qualified registered elector who is unable because of illness or physical disability to attend his or her polling place on the day of any primary or election or operate a voting machine and state distinctly and audibly that he or she is unable to do so as required by section 1218 of this act may at any time request, with the certification by his or her attending physician that he or she is permanently disabled and physically unable to attend the polls or operate a voting machine and make the distinct and audible statement required by section 1218 appended to the application hereinbefore required, to be placed on [a permanently] an annual disabled absentee ballot list file. An absentee ballot application shall be mailed to every [such] person otherwise eligible to receive one, by the first Monday in February each year, or within forty-eight hours of receipt of the request, whichever is later, so long as he or she does not lose his or her voting rights by failure to vote as otherwise required by this act. [Such] The person shall not be required to file a physician's certificate of disability with each application as required in subsection (e) of this section. Should [any such] a person lose his or her disability he or she shall inform the county board of elections of the county of his or her residence. An absentee ballot application mailed to an elector under this section, which is completed and timely returned by the elector, shall serve as an application for any and all primary, general or special elections to be held in the remainder of that calendar year and for all special elections to be held before the third Monday in February of the succeeding year. The transfer of a qualified registered elector on [a 20250HB0499PN0488 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 permanently] an annual disabled absentee ballot list from one county to another county shall only be permitted upon the request of the qualified registered elector.* * *(k) The Secretary of the Commonwealth may develop an electronic system through which all qualified electors may apply for an absentee ballot and request [permanent] annual absentee voter status under subsection (e.1), provided the system is able to capture a digitized or electronic signature of the applicant. A county board of elections shall treat any application or request received through the electronic system as if the application or request had been submitted on a paper form or any other format used by the county.Section 1302.1. Date of Application for Absentee Ballot.--(a) Except as provided in subsection (a.3), applications for absentee ballots shall be received in the office of the county board of elections not earlier than fifty (50) days before the primary or election, except that if a county board of elections determines that it would be appropriate to its operational needs, any applications for absentee ballots received more than fifty (50) days before the primary or election may be processed before that time. Applications for absentee ballots that are made in person at a county board of elections office shall be processed if received not later than five o'clock P.M. of the first Tuesday prior to the day of any primary or election. All other applications for absentee ballots shall be processed if received not later than the twelfth (12th) day prior to the day of any primary or election.* * *Section 1304. Envelopes for Official Absentee Ballots.--20250HB0499PN0488 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The county boards of election shall provide two additional envelopes for each official absentee ballot of [such] a size and shape as shall be prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, in order to permit the placing of one within the other and both within the mailing envelope. On the smaller of the two envelopes to be enclosed in the mailing envelope shall be printed, stamped or endorsed the words "Official Election Ballot," and nothing else. On the larger of the two envelopes, to be enclosed within the mailing envelope, shall be printed the form of the declaration of the elector, and the name and address of the county board of election of the proper county. The larger envelope shall also contain information indicating the local election district of the absentee voter. [Said] The form of declaration and envelope shall be as prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth and shall contain among other things a statement of the electors qualifications, together with a statement that [such] the elector has not already voted in [such] the primary or election. The mailing envelope addressed to the elector shall contain the two envelopes, the official absentee ballot, lists of candidates, when authorized by section 1303 subsection (b) of this act, the uniform instructions in form and substance as prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth and nothing else. Use of the inner envelope shall be in the discretion of the voter. Failure to use the inner envelope may not be a valid reason for disqualification of the ballot.Section 1306. Voting by Absentee Electors.--(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), at any time after receiving an official absentee ballot, but on or before eight o'clock P.M. the day of the primary or election, the elector shall, in 20250HB0499PN0488 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 secret, proceed to mark the ballot only in black lead pencil, indelible pencil or blue, black or blue-black ink, in fountain pen or ball point pen, and then fold the ballot, enclose and securely seal the same in the envelope on which is printed, stamped or endorsed "Official Election Ballot." This envelope shall then be placed in the second one, on which is printed the form of declaration of the elector, and the address of the elector's county board of election and the local election district of the elector. The elector shall then fill out, date and sign the declaration printed on [such envelope. Such] the envelope. The date written on the envelope shall be the date the elector has signed the declaration. Failure to sign the envelope or signing the envelope with a date that is not within the time period between the date the ballot was received by the voter and when the ballot was received by the county board of election shall not disqualify the ballot if the declaration is otherwise properly executed. The envelope shall then be securely sealed and the elector shall send same by mail, postage prepaid, except where franked, or deliver it in person to said county board of election.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1308.1. Secure Ballot Return Receptacles.--(a) A county board of elections may establish secure ballot return receptacles in which voters may return an absentee or mail-in ballot subject to the terms and conditions of this section.(b) If a county board of elections establishes a secure ballot return receptacle, the board shall provide notice to the electors within the county at least thirty days prior to the election by:20250HB0499PN0488 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A poster in the county elections office.(2) The county's publicly accessible Internet website in a highly visible location.(3) Posters in locations in the county where voters may congregate, such as the county courthouse, other county offices, student centers at local universities and colleges, senior citizen centers, retirement and nursing home community rooms and other similar locations.(4) Information included in absentee or mail-in voting materials sent to a voter.(c) Notices issued under subsection (b) shall include:(1) The ballot return deadline.(2) A list of county election offices and secure ballot return receptacles, including building names and street addresses.(3) The days and hours of operation of secure ballot return receptacles, including election day hours and if a secure ballot return receptacle will be available twenty-four hours per day, seven days per week.(4) Contact information for the county board of elections.(5) Accessibility information.(d) A secure ballot return receptacle shall be fully ADA compliant and in a well-lit, fixed location.(e) The county board of elections shall determine the hours of operation, which shall begin no later than thirty days prior to the election and include election day. Hours of operation shall include at a minimum one weeknight and one weekend time period during the five days prior to the primary or election.(f) A secure ballot return receptacle shall be tamper-resistant, locked and secured to ensure immobility while in use.20250HB0499PN0488 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) Staff authorized by the county board of elections shall monitor the secure ballot return receptacle during hours of operation, either in person or via video surveillance. Video recording shall be retained for one year from recording.(h) A secure ballot return receptacle shall have a sign posted on or near the receptacle that includes:(1) A label that states "Official Ballot Return Site."(2) A notice that the voter should return only his or her own ballot and that third-party return of ballots, including those of family members, is prohibited unless the individual is officially authorized to return another individual's ballot.(3) The penalties for tampering with the secure ballot return receptacles and intimidating voters, including forging or destroying ballots.(i) Ballots shall be collected at the end of operating hours of each day that a secure ballot return receptacle is available for use. Ballots shall be collected at the same time each day, as determined by the county elections office, if the secure ballot return receptacle is available for use on a twenty-four hours per day, seven days per week schedule. Two county employes shall be appointed to collect ballots. At least one shall be an employe assigned to the board of elections and the other may be a member of law enforcement, including a constable. The county board of elections shall use a chain of custody log approved by the department and deposit collected ballots in a secure container within the county board of elections office.Section 3. Sections 1302-D(g), 1302.1-D(a), 1302.2-D(b), 1304-D(a) and 1306-D(a) of the act are amended to read:Section 1302-D. Applications for official mail-in ballots.* * *20250HB0499PN0488 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) [Permanent] Annual mail-in voting list.--(1) Any qualified registered elector may request to be placed on [a permanent] an annual mail-in ballot list file at any time during the calendar year. A mail-in ballot application shall be mailed to every person otherwise eligible to receive a mail-in ballot application by the first Monday in February each year or within 48 hours of receipt of the request, whichever is later, so long as the person does not lose the person's voting rights by failure to vote as otherwise required by this act. A mail-in ballot application mailed to an elector under this section, which is completed and timely returned by the elector, shall serve as an application for any and all primary, general or special elections to be held in the remainder of that calendar year and for all special elections to be held before the third Monday in February of the succeeding year.(2) The Secretary of the Commonwealth may develop an electronic system through which all qualified electors may apply for a mail-in ballot and request [permanent] annual mail-in voter status under this section, provided the system is able to capture a digitized or electronic signature of the applicant. A county board of elections shall treat an application or request received through the electronic system as if the application or request had been submitted on a paper form or any other format used by the county.(3) The transfer of a qualified registered elector on [a permanent] an annual mail-in voting list from one county to another county shall only be permitted upon the request of the qualified registered elector.Section 1302.1-D. Date of application for mail-in ballot.20250HB0499PN0488 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) General rule.--Applications for mail-in ballots shall be received in the office of the county board of elections not earlier than 50 days before the primary or election, except that if a county board of elections determines that it would be appropriate to the county board of elections' operational needs, any applications for mail-in ballots received more than 50 days before the primary or election may be processed before that time. Applications for mail-in ballots that are made in person at the county board of elections office shall be processed if received not later than five o'clock P.M. of the first Tuesday prior to the day of any primary or election. All other applications for mail-in ballots that are received via United States mail or online shall be processed if received not later than the twelfth day prior to the day of any primary or election.* * *Section 1302.2-D. Approval of application for mail-in ballot.* * *(b) Duties of county boards of elections and registration commissions.--The duties of the county boards of elections and the registration commissions with respect to the insertion of the mail-in voter's record shall include only the applications as are received in person on or before the first Tuesday prior to the primary or election and applications as are received via United States mail or online on or before the twelfth day prior to the primary or election.* * *Section 1304-D. Envelopes for official mail-in ballots.(a) Additional envelopes.--The county boards of election shall provide two additional envelopes for each official mail-in 20250HB0499PN0488 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ballot of a size and shape as shall be prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, in order to permit the placing of one within the other and both within the mailing envelope. On the smaller of the two envelopes to be enclosed in the mailing envelope shall be printed, stamped or endorsed the words "Official Election Ballot," and nothing else. On the larger of the two envelopes, to be enclosed within the mailing envelope, shall be printed the form of the declaration of the elector and the name and address of the county board of election of the proper county. The larger envelope shall also contain information indicating the local election district of the mail-in voter. Use of the inner envelope shall be in the discretion of the voter. Failure to use the inner envelope may not be a valid reason for disqualification of the ballot.* * *Section 1306-D. Voting by mail-in electors.(a) General rule.--At any time after receiving an official mail-in ballot, but on or before eight o'clock P.M. the day of the primary or election, the mail-in elector shall, in secret, proceed to mark the ballot only in black lead pencil, indelible pencil or blue, black or blue-black ink, in fountain pen or ball point pen, and then fold the ballot, enclose and securely seal the same in the envelope on which is printed, stamped or endorsed "Official Election Ballot." This envelope shall then be placed in the second one, on which is printed the form of declaration of the elector, and the address of the elector's county board of election and the local election district of the elector. The elector shall then fill out, date and sign the declaration printed on [such envelope. Such] the envelope. The date written on the envelope shall be the date the elector has 20250HB0499PN0488 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 signed the declaration. Failure to sign the envelope or signing the envelope with a date that is not within the time period between the date the ballot was received by the voter and when the ballot was received by the county board of election shall not disqualify the ballot if the declaration is otherwise properly executed. The envelope shall then be securely sealed and the elector shall send same by mail, postage prepaid, except where franked, or deliver it in person to said county board of election.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0499PN0488 - 11 - 1234567891011